California statutes. Labor Code
(3) Surveys performed pursuant to this section shall be conducted as often as deemed necessary by the administrative director to assure the protection of employees, but not less frequently than once every three years. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the survey team to visit each clinic, hospital, office, or facility of the organization.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the medical survey team to review peer review proceedings and records conducted and compiled under this section or in medical records. However, the administrative director shall be authorized to require onsite review of these peer review proceedings and records or medical records where necessary to determine that quality health care is being delivered to employees. Where medical record review is authorized, the survey team shall ensure that the confidentiality of the physician-patient relationship is safeguarded in accordance with existing law and neither the survey team nor the administrative director or the administrative director’s staff may be compelled to disclose this information except in accordance with the physician-patient relationship. The administrative director shall ensure that the confidentiality of the peer review proceedings and records is maintained. The disclosure of the peer review proceedings and records to the administrative director or the medical survey team shall not alter the status of the proceedings or records as privileged and confidential communications.

(5) The procedures and standards utilized by the survey team shall be made available to the organizations prior to the conducting of medical surveys.

(6) During the survey, the members of the survey team shall offer such advice and assistance to the organization as deemed appropriate.

(7) The administrative director shall notify the organization of deficiencies found by the survey team. The administrative director shall give the organization a reasonable time to correct the deficiencies, and failure on the part of the organization to comply to the administrative director’s satisfaction shall constitute cause for disciplinary action against the organization.

(8) Reports of all surveys, deficiencies, and correction plans shall be open to public inspection, except that no surveys, deficiencies or correction plans shall be made public unless the organization has had an opportunity to review the survey and file a statement of response within 30 days, to be attached to the report.

(p) (1) All records, books, and papers of an organization, management company, solicitor, solicitor firm, and any provider or subcontractor providing medical or other services to an organization, management company, solicitor, or solicitor firm shall be open to inspection during normal business hours by the administrative director.

(2) To the extent feasible, all the records, books, and papers described in paragraph (1) shall be located in this state. In examining those records outside this state, the administrative director shall consider the cost to the organization, consistent with the effectiveness of the administrative director’s examination, and may upon reasonable notice require that these records, books, and papers, or a specified portion thereof, be made available for examination in this state, or that a true and accurate copy of these records, books, and papers, or a specified portion thereof, be furnished to the administrative director.

(q) (1) The administrative director shall conduct an examination of the administrative affairs of any organization, and each person with whom the organization has made arrangements for administrative, or management services, as often as deemed necessary to protect the interest of employees, but not less frequently than once every five years.

(2) The expense of conducting any additional or nonroutine examinations pursuant to this section, and the expense of conducting any additional or nonroutine medical surveys pursuant to subdivision (o) shall be charged against the organization being examined or surveyed. The amount shall include the actual salaries or compensation paid to the persons making the examination or survey, the expenses incurred in the course thereof, and overhead costs in connection therewith as fixed by the administrative director. In determining the cost of examinations or surveys, the administrative director may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations or surveys of workers’ compensation health care organizations for the fiscal year. The amount charged shall be remitted by the organization to the administrative director.

(3) Reports of all examinations shall be open to public inspection, except that no examination shall be made public, unless the organization has had an opportunity to review the examination report and file a statement or response within 30 days, to be attached to the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 682, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.7.

(a) The Workers’ Compensation Managed Care Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury for the administration of Sections 4600.3 and 4600.5 by the Division of Workers’ Compensation. The administrative director shall establish a schedule of fees and revenues to be charged to certified health care organizations and applicants for certification to fully fund the administration of these provisions and to repay amounts received as a loan from the General Fund. All fees and revenues shall be deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Managed Care Fund and shall be used when appropriated by the Legislature solely for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the Division of Workers’ Compensation under Section 4600.3 or 4600.5. 

(b) On and after July 1, 1998, no funds received as a loan from the General Fund shall be used to support the administration of Sections 4600.3 and 4600.5. The loan amount shall be repaid to the General Fund by assessing a surcharge on the enrollment fee for each of the next five fiscal years. In the event the surcharge does not produce sufficient revenue over this period, the surcharge shall be adjusted to fully repay the loan over the following three fiscal years, with the final assessment calculated by dividing the balance of the loan by the enrollees at the end of the final fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4601.

(a) If the employee so requests, the employer shall tender the employee one change of physician. The employee at any time may request that the employer tender this one-time change of physician. Upon request of the employee for a change of physician, the maximum amount of time permitted by law for the employer or insurance carrier to provide the employee an alternative physician or, if requested by the employee, a chiropractor, or an acupuncturist shall be five working days from the date of the request. Notwithstanding the 30-day time period specified in Section 4600, a request for a change of physician pursuant to this section may be made at any time. The employee is entitled, in any serious case, upon request, to the services of a consulting physician, chiropractor, or acupuncturist of his or her choice at the expense of the employer. The treatment shall be at the expense of the employer.

(b) If an employee requesting a change of physician pursuant to subdivision (a) has notified his or her employer in writing prior to the date of injury that he or she has a personal chiropractor, the alternative physician tendered by the employer to the employee, if the employee so requests, shall be the employee’s personal chiropractor. For the purpose of this article, “personal chiropractor” means the employee’s regular chiropractor licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, who has previously directed treatment of the employee, and who retains the employee’s chiropractic treatment records, including his or her chiropractic history.

(c) If an employee requesting a change of physician pursuant to subdivision (a) has notified his or her employer in writing prior to the date of injury that he or she has a personal acupuncturist, the alternative physician tendered by the employer to the employee, if the employee so requests, shall be the employee’s personal acupuncturist. For the purpose of this article, “personal acupuncturist” means the employee’s regular acupuncturist licensed pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 4935) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, who has previously directed treatment of the employee, and who retains the employee’s acupuncture treatment records, including his or her acupuncture history.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 440, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4602.

If the employee so requests, the employer shall procure certification by either the administrative director or the appeals board as the case may be of the competency, for the particular case, of the consulting or additional physicians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.

If the employer desires a change of physicians or chiropractor, he may petition the administrative director who, upon a showing of good cause by the employer, may order the employer to provide a panel of five physicians, or if requested by the employee, four physicians and one chiropractor competent to treat the particular case, from which the employee must select one.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1259.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.2.

(a) (1) Upon selecting a physician pursuant to Section 4600, the employee or physician shall notify the employer of the name and address, including the name of the medical group, if applicable, of the physician. The physician shall submit a report to the employer within five working days from the date of the initial examination, as required by Section 6409, and shall submit periodic reports at intervals that may be prescribed by rules and regulations adopted by the administrative director.

(2) If the employer objects to the employee’s selection of the physician on the grounds that the physician is not within the medical provider network used by the employer, and
 there is a final determination that the employee was entitled to select the
 physician pursuant to Section 4600, the employee shall be entitled to continue treatment with that physician at the employer’s expense in accordance with this division, notwithstanding Section 4616.2. The employer shall be required to pay from the date of the initial examination if the physician’s report was submitted within five working days of the initial examination. If the physician’s report was submitted more than five working days after the initial examination, the employer and the employee shall not be required to pay for any services prior to the date the physician’s report was submitted.

(3) If the employer objects to the employee’s selection of the physician on the grounds that the physician is not within the medical provider network used by the employer, and there is a final determination that the employee was
 not entitled to select a physician outside of the medical provider network, the employer is not liable for treatment provided by or at the direction of that physician or for any consequences of the treatment obtained outside the network.

(b) (1) (A) A provider of services provided pursuant to Section 4600, including, but not limited to, physicians, hospitals, pharmacies, interpreters, copy services, transportation services, and home health care services, shall submit its request for payment with an itemization of services provided and the charge for each service, a copy of all reports showing the services performed, the prescription or referral from the primary treating physician if the services were performed by a person other than the primary treating physician, and any evidence of authorization for
 the services that may have been received. This section does not prohibit an employer, insurer, or third-party claims administrator from establishing, through written agreement, an alternative manual or electronic request for payment with providers for services provided pursuant to Section 4600.

(B) Effective for services provided on or after January 1, 2017, the request for payment with an itemization of services provided and the charge for each service shall be submitted to the employer within 12 months of the date of service or within 12 months of the date of discharge for inpatient facility services. The administrative director shall adopt rules to implement the 12-month limitation period. The rules shall define circumstances that constitute good cause for an exception to the 12-month period, including provisions to address the
 circumstances of a nonoccupational injury or illness later found to be a compensable injury or illness. The request for payment is barred unless timely submitted.

(C) The request for payment with an itemization of services provided and the charge for each service shall be submitted to the employer with the national provider identifier (NPI) number for the physician or provider who provided the service for which payment is
 sought in accordance with rules adopted by the administrative director pursuant to Section 4603.4. Failure to include the physician’s or provider’s NPI shall result in the request for payment being barred until the physician’s or provider’s NPI is submitted with the request for payment. This subparagraph does not preclude an employer, insurer, pharmacy benefit manager, or third-party claims administrator from requiring the
 physician’s
 or provider’s NPI at an earlier date. This subparagraph is declaratory of existing law.

(D) Notwithstanding the requirements of this paragraph, a copy of the prescription shall not be required with a request for payment for pharmacy services, unless the provider of services has entered into a written agreement, as provided in this paragraph, that requires a copy of a prescription for a pharmacy service.

(E) This section does not preclude an employer, insurer, pharmacy benefits manager, or third-party claims administrator from requesting a copy of the prescription during a review of any records of prescription drugs that were dispensed by a pharmacy.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 4603.4, or under contracts authorized under Section 5307.11, payment for medical treatment provided or prescribed by the treating physician selected by the employee or designated by the employer shall be made at reasonable maximum amounts in the official medical fee schedule, pursuant to Section 5307.1, in effect on the date of service. Payments shall be made by the employer with an explanation of review pursuant to Section 4603.3 within 45 days after receipt of each separate itemization of medical services provided, together with any required reports and any written authorization for services that may have been received by the physician. If the itemization or a portion thereof is contested, denied, or considered incomplete, the physician shall be notified, in the explanation of
 review, that the itemization is contested, denied, or considered incomplete, within 30 days after receipt of the itemization by the employer. An explanation of review that states an itemization is incomplete shall also state all additional information required to make a decision. A properly documented list of services provided and not paid at the rates then in effect under Section 5307.1 within the 45-day period shall be paid at the rates then in effect and increased by 15 percent, together with interest at the same rate as judgments in civil actions retroactive to the date of receipt of the itemization, unless the employer does both of the following:

(A) Pays the provider at the rates in effect within the 45-day period.

(B) Advises, in an explanation of review pursuant
 to Section 4603.3, the physician, or another provider of the items being contested, the reasons for contesting these items, and the remedies available to the physician or the other provider if the physician or provider disagrees. In the case of an itemization that includes services provided by a hospital, outpatient surgery center, or independent diagnostic facility, advice that a request has been made for an audit of the itemization shall satisfy the requirements of this paragraph.

An employer’s liability to a physician or another provider under this section for delayed payments shall not affect its liability to an employee under Section 5814 or any other provision of this division.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the employer is a governmental entity, payment for medical treatment provided or
 prescribed by the treating physician selected by the employee or designated by the employer shall be made within 60 days after receipt of each separate itemization, together with any required reports and any written authorization for services that may have been received by the physician.

(4) Duplicate submissions of medical services itemizations, for which an explanation of review was previously provided, shall require no further or additional notification or objection by the employer to the medical provider and shall not subject the employer to any additional penalties or interest pursuant to this section for failing to respond to the duplicate submission. This paragraph applies only to duplicate submissions and does not apply to any other penalties or interest that may be applicable to the original submission.

(5) (A) An employer may defer objecting to or paying any bill submitted by, or on behalf of, a provider whose liens are stayed pursuant to Section 4615, and the time limits for taking any action prescribed by paragraphs (2) and (3) shall not commence until the stay is lifted pursuant to Section 4615.

(B) An employer may object to any bill submitted by, or on behalf of, a provider who has been suspended pursuant to Section 139.21.

(c) Interest or an increase in compensation paid by an insurer pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as an increase in compensation under subdivision (d) of Section 4650 for the purposes of any classification of risks and premium rates, and
 any system of merit rating approved or issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11730) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(d) (1) Whenever an employer or insurer employs an individual or contracts with an entity to conduct a review of an itemization submitted by a physician or medical provider, the employer or insurer shall make available to that individual or entity all documentation submitted together with that itemization by the physician or medical provider. When an individual or entity conducting an itemization review determines that additional information or documentation is necessary to review the itemization, the individual or entity shall contact the claims administrator or insurer to obtain the necessary information or documentation that was submitted by the physician or medical provider
 pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) (A) An individual or entity reviewing an itemization of service submitted by a physician or medical provider, including a medical provider network, an entity that provides ancillary services, as defined in Section 4616.5, or an entity providing services for or on behalf of the medical provider network or its providers, shall not alter the procedure codes listed or recommend reduction of the amount of the payment unless the documentation submitted by the
 physician or medical provider with the itemization of service has been reviewed by that individual or entity. If the reviewer does not recommend payment for services as itemized by the physician or medical provider, the explanation of review shall provide the physician or medical provider with a specific explanation as to why the reviewer altered the procedure code or changed other parts of the itemization and the specific deficiency in the itemization or documentation that caused the reviewer to conclude that the altered procedure code or amount recommended for payment more accurately represents the service performed.

(B) The amendments to subparagraph (A) made by the act adding this subparagraph are declaratory of existing law.

(e) (1) If the provider
 disputes the amount paid, the provider may request a second review within 90 days of service of the explanation of review or an order of the appeals board resolving the threshold issue as stated in the explanation of review pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4603.3. The request for a second review shall be submitted to the employer on a form prescribed by the administrative director and shall include all of the following:

(A) The date of the explanation of review and the claim number or other unique identifying number provided on the explanation of review.

(B) The item and amount in dispute.

(C) The additional payment requested and the reason therefor.

(D) The additional information provided in response to a request in the first explanation of review or any other additional information provided in support of the additional payment requested.

(2) If the only dispute is the amount of payment and the provider does not request a second review within 90 days, the bill shall be deemed satisfied and neither the employer nor the employee shall be liable for any further payment.

(3) Within 14 days of a request for second review, the employer shall respond with a final written determination on each of the items or amounts in dispute. Payment of any balance not in dispute shall be made within 21 days of receipt of the request for second review. This time limit may be extended by mutual written agreement.

(4) If the provider contests the amount paid, after receipt of the second review, the provider shall request an independent bill review as provided for in Section 4603.6.

(f) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (e), the appeals board shall have jurisdiction over disputes arising out of this section pursuant to Section 5304.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 647, Sec. 5.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.3.

(a) Upon payment, adjustment, or denial of a complete or incomplete itemization of medical services, an employer shall provide an explanation of review in the manner prescribed by the administrative director that shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement of the items or procedures billed and the amounts requested by the provider to be paid.

(2) The amount paid.

(3) The basis for any adjustment, change, or denial of the item or procedure billed.

(4) The additional information required to make a decision for an incomplete itemization.

(5) If a denial of payment is for some reason other than a fee dispute, the reason for the denial.

(6) Information on whom to contact on behalf of the employer if a dispute arises over the payment of the billing. The explanation of review shall inform the medical provider of the time limit to raise any objection regarding the items or procedures paid or disputed and how to obtain an independent review of the medical bill pursuant to Section 4603.6.

(b) The administrative director may adopt regulations requiring the use of electronic explanations of review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 37.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.4.

(a) The administrative director shall adopt rules and regulations to do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that all health care providers and facilities submit medical bills for payment on standardized forms.

(2) Require acceptance by employers of electronic claims for payment of medical services.

(3) Ensure confidentiality of medical information submitted on electronic claims for payment of medical services.

(4) Require the timely submission of paper or electronic bills in conformity with subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 4603.2.

(b) To the extent feasible, standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be consistent with existing standards under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

(c) Require all employers to accept electronic claims for payment of medical services.

(d) Payment for medical treatment provided or prescribed by the treating physician selected by the employee or designated by the employer shall be made with an explanation of review by the employer within 15 working days after electronic receipt of an itemized electronic billing for services at or below the maximum fees provided in the official medical fee schedule adopted pursuant to
 Section 5307.1. If the billing is contested, denied, or incomplete, payment shall be made with an explanation of review of any uncontested amounts within 15 working days after electronic receipt of the billing, and payment of the balance shall be made in accordance with Section 4603.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 214, Sec. 2.   (SB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.5.

The administrative director shall adopt rules pertaining to the format and content of notices required by this article; define reasonable geographic areas for the purposes of Section 4600; specify time limits for all such notices, and responses thereto; and adopt any other rules necessary to make effective the requirements of this article.

Employers shall notify all employees of their rights under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1259.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.6.

(a) If the only dispute is the amount of payment and the provider has received a second review that did not resolve the dispute, the provider may request an independent bill review within 30 calendar days of service of the second review pursuant to Section 4603.2 or 4622. If the provider fails to request an independent bill review within 30 days, the bill shall be deemed satisfied, and neither the employer nor the employee shall be liable for any further payment. If the employer has contested liability for any issue other than the reasonable amount payable for services, that issue shall be resolved prior to filing a request for independent bill review, and the time limit for requesting independent bill review shall not begin to run until the resolution of that issue becomes final, except as provided for in
 Section 4622.

(b) A request for independent review shall be made on a form prescribed by the administrative director, and shall include copies of the original billing itemization, any supporting documents that were furnished with the original billing, the explanation of review, the request for second review together with any supporting documentation submitted with that request, and the final explanation of the second review. The administrative director may require that requests for independent bill review be submitted electronically. A copy of the request, together with all required documents, shall be served on the employer. Only the request form and the proof of payment of the fee required by subdivision (c) shall be filed with the administrative director. Upon notice of assignment of the independent bill reviewer, the requesting party shall submit the documents listed in this subdivision to the independent bill reviewer within 10 days.

(c) The provider shall pay to the administrative director a fee determined by the administrative director to cover no more than the reasonable estimated cost of independent bill review and administration of the independent bill review program. The administrative director may prescribe different fees depending on the number of items in the bill or other criteria determined by regulation adopted by the administrative director. If any additional payment is found owing from the employer to the medical provider, the employer shall reimburse the provider for the fee in addition to the amount found owing.

(d) Upon receipt of a request for independent bill review and the required fee, the administrative director or the administrative director’s designee shall assign the request to an independent bill reviewer within 30 days and notify the medical provider and employer of the independent
 reviewer assigned.

(e) The independent bill reviewer shall review the materials submitted by the parties and make a written determination of any additional amounts to be paid to the medical provider and state the reasons for the determination. If the independent bill reviewer deems necessary, the independent bill reviewer may request additional documents from the medical provider or employer. The employer shall have no obligation to serve medical reports on the provider unless the reports are requested by the independent bill reviewer. If additional documents are requested, the parties shall respond with the documents requested within 30 days and shall provide the other party with copies of any documents submitted to the independent reviewer, and the independent reviewer shall make a written determination of any additional amounts to be paid to the medical provider and state the reasons for the determination within 60 days of the receipt of the
 administrative director’s assignment. The written determination of the independent bill reviewer shall be sent to the administrative director and provided to both the medical provider and the employer.

(f) The determination of the independent bill reviewer shall be deemed a determination and order of the administrative director. The determination is final and binding on all parties unless an aggrieved party files with the appeals board a verified appeal from the medical bill review determination of the administrative director within 20 days of the service of the determination. The medical bill review determination of the administrative director shall be presumed to be correct and shall be set aside only upon clear and convincing evidence of one or more of the following grounds for appeal:

(1) The administrative director acted without or in excess of his or her powers.

(2) The determination of the administrative director was procured by fraud.

(3) The independent bill reviewer was subject to a material conflict of interest that is in violation of Section 139.5.

(4) The determination was the result of bias on the basis of race, national origin, ethnic group identification, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, color, or disability.

(5) The determination was the result of a plainly erroneous express or implied finding of fact, provided that the mistake of fact is a matter of ordinary knowledge based on the information submitted for review and not a matter that is subject to expert opinion.

(g) If the determination of the administrative director is reversed,
 the dispute shall be remanded to the administrative director to submit the dispute to independent bill review by a different independent review organization. In the event that a different independent bill review organization is not available after remand, the administrative director shall submit the dispute to the original bill review organization for review by a different reviewer within the organization. In no event shall the appeals board or any higher court make a determination of ultimate fact contrary to the determination of the bill review organization.

(h) Once the independent bill reviewer has made a determination regarding additional amounts to be paid to the medical provider, the employer shall pay the additional amounts per the timely payment requirements set forth in Sections 4603.2 and 4603.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 39.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.

Controversies between employer and employee arising under this chapter shall be determined by the appeals board, upon the request of either party, except as otherwise provided by Section 4610.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 40.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.5.

(a) The recommended guidelines set forth in the medical treatment utilization schedule adopted by the administrative director pursuant to Section 5307.27 shall be presumptively correct on the issue of extent and scope of medical treatment. The presumption is rebuttable and may be controverted by a preponderance of the scientific medical evidence establishing that a variance from the guidelines reasonably is required to cure or relieve the injured worker from the effects of his or her injury. The presumption created is one affecting the burden of proof.

(b) The recommended guidelines set forth in the schedule adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall reflect practices that are evidence and scientifically based, nationally
 recognized, and peer reviewed. The guidelines shall be designed to assist providers by offering an analytical framework for the evaluation and treatment of injured workers, and shall constitute care in accordance with Section 4600 for all injured workers diagnosed with industrial conditions.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding the medical treatment utilization schedule, for injuries occurring on and after January 1, 2004, an employee shall be entitled to no more than 24 chiropractic, 24 occupational therapy, and 24 physical therapy visits per industrial injury.

(2) (A) Paragraph (1) shall not apply when an employer authorizes, in writing, additional visits to a health care practitioner for physical medicine services. Payment or authorization for treatment beyond the limits set forth in paragraph (1) shall not be deemed a waiver of the limits set
 forth by paragraph (1) with respect to future requests for authorization.

(B) The Legislature finds and declares that the amendments made to subparagraph (A) by the act adding this subparagraph are declaratory of existing law.

(3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to visits for postsurgical physical medicine and postsurgical rehabilitation services provided in compliance with a postsurgical treatment utilization schedule established by the administrative director pursuant to Section 5307.27.

(d) For all injuries not covered by the official utilization schedule adopted pursuant to Section 5307.27, authorized treatment shall be in accordance with other evidence-based medical treatment guidelines that are recognized generally by the national medical community and scientifically based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 41.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4605.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit the right of the employee to provide, at his or her own expense, a consulting physician or any attending physicians whom he or she desires. Any report prepared by consulting or attending physicians pursuant to this section shall not be the sole basis of an award of compensation. A qualified medical evaluator or authorized treating physician shall address any report procured pursuant to this section and shall indicate whether he or she agrees or disagrees with the findings or opinions stated in the report, and shall identify the bases for this opinion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 42.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4606.

Any county, city and county, city, school district, or other public corporation within the state which was a self-insured employer under the “Workmen’s Compensation, Insurance and Safety Act,” enacted by Chapter 176 of the Statutes of 1913, may provide such medical, and hospital treatment, including nursing, medicines, medical and surgical supplies, crutches, and apparatus, including artificial members, which is reasonably required to cure or relieve from the effects of an injury to a former employee who was covered under such act, without regard to the 90-day limitation of subdivision (a) of Section 15 of such act for medical treatment. The provisions of this section shall not be operative in any such county, city and county, city, school district, or other public corporation unless adopted by a resolution of the governing body of such public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 451.)
-------------------------------------------

4607.

Where a party to a proceeding institutes proceedings to terminate an award made by the appeals board to an applicant for continuing medical treatment and is unsuccessful in such proceedings, the appeals board may determine the amount of attorney’s fees reasonably incurred by the applicant in resisting the proceeding to terminate the medical treatment, and may assess such reasonable attorney’s fees as a cost upon the party instituting the proceedings to terminate the award of the appeals board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

4608.

No workers’ compensation insurer, self-insured employer, or agent of an insurer or self-insured employer, shall refuse to pay pharmacy benefits solely because the claim form utilized is reproduced by the person providing the pharmacy benefits, provided the reproduced form is an exact copy of that used by the insurer, self-insured employer, or agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4609.

(a) In order to prevent the improper selling, leasing, or transferring of a health care provider’s contract, it is the intent of the Legislature that every arrangement that results in any payor paying a health care provider a reduced rate for health care services based on the health care provider’s participation in a network or panel shall be disclosed by the contracting agent to the provider in advance and shall actively encourage employees to use the network, unless the health care provider agrees to provide discounts without that active encouragement.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2000, every contracting agent that sells, leases, assigns, transfers, or conveys its list of contracted health care providers and their contracted reimbursement rates to a payor, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), or another contracting agent shall, upon entering or renewing a provider contract, do all of the following:

(1) Disclose whether the list of contracted providers may be sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to other payors or other contracting agents, and specify whether those payors or contracting agents include workers’ compensation insurers or automobile insurers.
